Illinois, session 104th, HB2474.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 7-144 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/7-144)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 7-144)7    Sec. 7-144. Retirement annuities; suspended during 8employment. 9    (a) If any person receiving any annuity again becomes an 10employee and receives earnings from employment in a position 11requiring him, or entitling him to elect, to become a 12participating employee, then the annuity payable to such 13employee shall be suspended as of the first day of the month 14coincidental with or next following the date upon which such 15person becomes such an employee, unless the person is 16authorized under subsection (b) of Section 7-137.1 of this 17Code to continue receiving a retirement annuity during that 18period. Upon proper qualification of the participating 19employee payment of such annuity may be resumed on the first 20day of the month following such qualification and upon proper 21application therefor. The participating employee in such case 22shall be entitled to a supplemental annuity arising from 23service and credits earned subsequent to such re-entry as a   HB2474- 2 -LRB104 06357 RPS 16393 b1participating employee.2    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, an 3annuitant shall be considered a participating employee if he 4or she returns to work as an employee with a participating 5employer and works more than 599 hours annually (or 999 hours 6annually with a participating employer that has adopted a 7resolution pursuant to subsection (e) of Section 7-137 of this 8Code). Each of these annual periods shall commence on the 9month and day upon which the annuitant is first employed with 10the participating employer following the effective date of the 11annuity. 12    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, until 13January 1, 2030, an annuitant receiving an annuity under 14Section 7-142.1 shall be considered a participating employee 15if the annuitant returns to work as a school security guard or 16school resource officer employed by a participating employer 17and works more than 1,000 hours annually. 18    (a-5) If any annuitant under this Article must be 19considered a participating employee per the provisions of 20subsection (a) of this Section, and the participating 21municipality or participating instrumentality that employs or 22re-employs that annuitant knowingly fails to notify the Board 23to suspend the annuity, the participating municipality or 24participating instrumentality may be required to reimburse the 25Fund for an amount up to one-half of the total of any annuity 26payments made to the annuitant after the date the annuity   HB2474- 3 -LRB104 06357 RPS 16393 b1should have been suspended, as determined by the Board. In no 2case shall the total amount repaid by the annuitant plus any 3amount reimbursed by the employer to the Fund be more than the 4total of all annuity payments made to the annuitant after the 5date the annuity should have been suspended. This subsection 6shall not apply if the annuitant returned to work for the 7employer for less than 12 months.8    The Fund shall notify all annuitants that they must notify 9the Fund immediately if they return to work for any 10participating employer. The notification by the Fund shall 11occur upon retirement and no less than annually thereafter in 12a format determined by the Fund. The Fund shall also develop 13and maintain a system to track annuitants who have returned to 14work and notify the participating employer and annuitant at 15least annually of the limitations on returning to work under 16this Section.17    (b) Supplemental annuities to persons who return to 18service for less than 48 months shall be computed under the 19provisions of Sections 7-141, 7-142, and 7-143. In determining 20whether an employee is eligible for an annuity which requires 21a minimum period of service, his entire period of service 22shall be taken into consideration but the supplemental annuity 23shall be based on earnings and service in the supplemental 24period only. The effective date of the suspended and 25supplemental annuity for the purpose of increases after 26retirement shall be considered to be the effective date of the   HB2474- 4 -LRB104 06357 RPS 16393 b1suspended annuity.2    (c) Supplemental annuities to persons who return to 3service for 48 months or more shall be a monthly amount 4determined as follows:5        (1) An amount shall be computed under subparagraph b 6    of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 7-142, 7    considering all of the service credits of the employee.8        (2) The actuarial value in monthly payments for life 9    of the annuity payments made before suspension shall be 10    determined and subtracted from the amount determined in 11    paragraph (1) above.12        (3) The monthly amount of the suspended annuity, with 13    any applicable increases after retirement computed from 14    the effective date to the date of reinstatement, shall be 15    subtracted from the amount determined in paragraph (2) 16    above and the remainder shall be the amount of the 17    supplemental annuity provided that this amount shall not 18    be less than the amount computed under subsection (b) of 19    this Section.20        (4) The suspended annuity shall be reinstated at an 21    amount including any increases after retirement from the 22    effective date to date of reinstatement.23        (5) The effective date of the combined suspended and 24    supplemental annuities for the purposes of increases after 25    retirement shall be considered to be the effective date of 26    the supplemental annuity.  HB2474- 5 -LRB104 06357 RPS 16393 b1    (d) If a Tier 2 regular employee becomes a member or 2participant under any other system or fund created by this 3Code and is employed on a full-time basis, except for those 4members or participants exempted from the provisions of 5subsection (a) of Section 1-160 of this Code (other than a 6participating employee under this Article), then the person's 7retirement annuity shall be suspended during that employment. 8Upon termination of that employment, the person's retirement 9annuity shall resume and be recalculated as required by this 10Section. 11    (e) If a Tier 2 regular employee first began participation 12on or after January 1, 2012 and is receiving a retirement 13annuity and accepts on a contractual basis a position to 14provide services to a governmental entity from which he or she 15has retired, then that person's annuity or retirement pension 16shall be suspended during that contractual service, 17notwithstanding the provisions of any other Section in this 18Article. Such annuitant shall notify the Fund, as well as his 19or her contractual employer, of his or her retirement status 20before accepting contractual employment. A person who fails to 21submit such notification shall be guilty of a Class A 22misdemeanor and required to pay a fine of $1,000. Upon 23termination of that contractual employment, the person's 24retirement annuity shall resume and be recalculated as 25required by this Section. 26(Source: P.A. 102-210, eff. 1-1-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)   HB2474- 6 -LRB104 06357 RPS 16393 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.